Washington statutes.
RCW 32.32.365

Representations upon filing of application.

Except as provided in RCW 32.32.370, the filing of any application or amendment thereto under this chapter shall constitute a representation of the applicant by its duly authorized representative, the applicant's principal executive officer, the applicant's principal financial officer, and the applicant's principal accounting officer, and each member of the applicant's board of directors (whether or not the director has signed the application or any amendment thereto) severally that (1) he or she has read the application or amendment, (2) in the opinion of each such person he or she has made such examination and investigation as is necessary to enable him or her to express an informed opinion that the application or amendment complies to the best of his or her knowledge and belief with the applicable requirements of this chapter, and (3) each such person holds this informed opinion.

[ 1981 c 85 s 72.]